Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201584-316
Auditor of Public Accounts; powers; employees; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

(1) The Auditor of Public Accounts may decide not to include in any document that will be a public record the names of persons providing information to the Auditor of Public Accounts.

(2) No employee of the State of Nebraska or any of its political subdivisions who provides information to the Auditor of Public Accounts shall be subject to any personnel action, as defined in section 81-2703, in connection with his or her employment as a result of providing such information.

(3) Any person exercising his or her supervisory or managerial authority to recommend, approve, direct, or otherwise take or affect personnel action in violation of subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be subject to personnel action up to and including dismissal from employment with the state or political subdivision.

Laws 2015, LB539, § 13.